sk-SK: Napätie: Extra ťažký; Ťažký; Ľahký; Stredný; Iné
zh-CN: 张力: 超重; 重; 轻; 媒介; 其他
sv: Spänning: Extra tung; Tung; Lätt; Medium; Övrigt
vi: Độ căng: Cực nặng; Nặng; Nhẹ; Vừa; Khác
zh-TW: 張力: 超重型; 重型; 輕型; 媒介; 其他
hr-HR: Napetost: Ekstra teško; Teška; Lagana; Srednje; Ostalo
fi: Jännitys: Erittäin raskas; Raskas; Kevyt; Keskimääräinen; Muu
nl: Spanning: Extra zwaar; Zwaar; Licht; Medium; Andere
sl-SI: Napetost: Zelo močna; Močna; Rahla; Srednja; Drugo
it: Tensione corde: Estremamente forte; Pesante; Leggero; Medio; Altro
el: Τάση: Εξαιρετικά βαρύ; Μεγάλη; Ελαφριά; Μέση; Άλλο
bg-BG: Опън: Изключително тежък; Тежък; Лек; Среден; Други
ja: 弦の張り: エクストラヘビー; 重い; 軽い; 媒体; その他
hu: Feszesség: Extra nehéz; Nehéz; Könnyű; Közepes; Egyéb
pl: Napięcie: Bardzo ciężki; Ciężki; Lekki; Środek; Inne
de: Spannung: Besonders schwer; Schwer; Leicht; Medium; Sonstiges
cs: Napětí: Extra těžké; Těžká; Lehká; Médium; Jiné
fr: Tension: Extra-lourd; Lourd; Léger; Moyen; Autre
da: Spænding: Ekstra tung; Tung; Let; Medium; Andet
ru: Натяжение: Очень сильный; Сильный; Слабый; Средний; Другой
en: Tension: Extra-heavy; Heavy; Light; Medium; Other
lt-LT: Įtempimas: Itin sunkus; Sunkus; Lengvas; Vidutinis; Kita
ko: 장력: 매우 무거움; 무거움; 가벼움; 매체; 기타
nb: Spenning: Ekstra tung; Tung; Lett; Middels; Annet
ro-RO: Tensiune: Foarte ridicată; Ridicată; Redusă; Medie; Altele
pt-PT: Tensão: Extremamente elevada; Elevada; Ligeira; Médio; Outro
tr: Gerilme: Çok ağır; Ağır; Hafif; Orta; Diğer
pt-BR: Tensão: Extrapesado; Pesado; Leve; Médio; Outro
es: Tensión: Muy pesado; Pesado; Ligero; Medio; Otros
th: ความเครียด: ตึงมากเป็นพิเศษ; ตึงมาก; ตึงเล็กน้อย; สื่อ; อื่นๆ